District of Columbia statutes.
26-303

Exemptions.

The provisions of the chapter shall not apply to:

(1)

Banks, credit unions, trust companies, building and loan associations, and savings and loan associations organized under the laws of the United States or of the District of Columbia or authorized to do business in the District of Columbia;

(2)

The United States Postal Service; or

(3)

Any person who cashes checks without consideration or a charge.

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 4, 45 DCR 1782
This section is referenced in § 26-302.
1981 Ed., § 26-1103.